North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 6H. Public Toll Roads and Bridges.
§ 136-89.213.
Administration of tolls and requirements for open road tolls.

Administration. — The Authority is responsible for collecting tolls on Turnpike projects. In exercising its authority under

G.S. 136-89.183

to perform or procure services required by the Authority, the Authority may contract with one or more providers to perform part or all of the collection functions and may enter into agreements to exchange information, including confidential information under subsection (a1) of this section, that identifies motor vehicles and their owners with one or more of the following entities: the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation, another state, another toll operator, a toll collection-related organization, or a private entity that has entered into a partnership agreement with the Authority pursuant to

G.S. 136-89.183

(a)(17). Further, the Authority may assign its authority to fix, revise, charge, retain, enforce, and collect tolls and fees under this Article to a private entity that has entered into a partnership agreement with the Authority pursuant to G.S. 136-89.183(a)(17).

(a1)

Identifying information obtained by the Authority through an agreement is not a public record and is subject to the disclosure limitations in 18 U.S.C. § 2721, the federal Driver’s Privacy Protection Act. The Authority shall maintain the confidentiality of all information required to be kept confidential under 18 U.S.C. § 2721(a), as well as any financial information, transaction history, and information related to the collection of a toll or user fee from a person, including, but not limited to, photographs or other recorded images or automatic vehicle identification or driver account information generated by radio-frequency identification or other electronic means. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section:

The account holder may examine his own account information, and the Authority may use the account information only for purposes of collecting and enforcing tolls.

A party, by authority of a proper court order, may inspect and examine confidential account information.

Open Road Tolls. — If a Turnpike project uses an open road tolling system, the Authority must operate a facility that is in the immediate vicinity of the Turnpike project or provide an alternate means to accept cash payment of the toll and must place signs on the Turnpike project that give drivers the following information:

Notice that the driver is approaching a highway for which a toll is required. Signs providing this information must be placed before the toll is incurred.

The methods by which the toll may be paid.

If applicable, directions to the nearby facility that accepts cash payment of the toll.

History.

2008-225, s. 2; 2012-78, s. 12; 2013-183, s. 5.6.

§ 136-89.214.
Bill for unpaid open road toll.

Bill. — If a motor vehicle travels on a Turnpike project that uses an open road tolling system and a toll for traveling on the project is not paid prior to travel or at the time of travel, the Authority must send a bill by first-class mail to the registered owner of the motor vehicle or the person who had care, custody, and control of the vehicle as established under

G.S. 136-89.212(b)

for the amount of the unpaid toll; provided, however, that with the written consent of the registered owner of the motor vehicle or the person who had care, custody, and control of the vehicle as set forth above, the Authority may send the bill via electronic mail to a designated electronic mail account rather than by first-class mail. The Authority must send the bill within 90 days after the travel occurs, or within 90 days of receipt of a sworn affidavit submitted under

G.S. 136-89.212(b)

identifying the person who had care, custody, and control of the motor vehicle. If a bill is not sent within the required time, the Authority waives collection of the toll. The Authority must establish a billing period for unpaid open road tolls that is no shorter than 15 days. A bill for a billing period must include all unpaid tolls incurred by the same person during the billing period.

Information on Bill. — A bill sent under this section must include all of the following information:

The name and address of the registered owner of the motor vehicle that traveled on the Turnpike project or of the person identified under

G.S. 136-89.212(b)

.

The date the travel occurred, the approximate time the travel occurred, and each segment of the Turnpike project on which the travel occurred.

An image of the registration plate of the motor vehicle, if the Authority captured an electronic image of the motor vehicle when it traveled on the Turnpike project.

The amount of the toll due and an explanation of how payment may be made.

The date by which the toll must be paid to avoid the imposition of a processing fee under

G.S. 136-89.215

and the amount of the processing fee.

A statement that a vehicle owner who has unpaid tolls is subject to a civil penalty and may not renew the vehicle’s registration until the tolls and civil penalties are paid.

A clear and concise explanation of how to contest liability for the toll.

If applicable, a copy of the affidavit submitted under

G.S. 136-89.212(b)

identifying the person with care, custody, and control of the motor vehicle.

History.

2008-225, s. 2; 2010-133, s. 3; 2013-183, s. 5.6; 2013-360, s. 34.30; 2016-90, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-133, s. 3, effective December 1, 2010, substituted “is not paid prior to travel or at the time of travel” for “is not paid within 15 days after the travel occurs” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2013-183, s. 5.6, effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), inserted “or the person who had care, custody, and control of the vehicle as established under

G.S. 136-89.212(b)

” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, added “or within 90 days of receipt of a sworn affidavit submitted under

G.S. 136-89.212(b)

identifying the person who had care, custody, and control of the motor vehicle” in the second sentence; and, in subsection (b), added “or of the person identified under G.S. 136-89.212(b)” in subdivision (b)(1), and added subdivision (b)(8).

Session Laws 2016-90, s. 3, effective July 11, 2016, in subsection (a), inserted “provided, however, that with the written consent of the registered owner of the motor vehicle or the person who had care, custody, and control of the vehicle as set forth above, the Authority may send the bill via electronic mail to a designated electronic mail account rather than by first-class mail” in the first sentence.

§ 136-89.215.
Required action upon receiving bill for open road toll and processing fee for unpaid toll.

Action Required. — A person who receives a bill from the Authority for an unpaid open road toll must take one of the following actions within 30 days of the date of the bill:

Pay the bill.

Send a written request to the Authority for a review of the toll.

Fee. — If a person does not take one of the actions required under subsection (a) of this section within the required time, the Authority may add a processing fee to the amount the person owes. The processing fee may not exceed six dollars ($6.00). A person may not be charged more than forty-eight dollars ($48.00) in processing fees in a 12-month period.The Authority must set the processing fee at an amount that does not exceed the costs of collecting the unpaid toll.

History.

2008-225, s. 2; 2010-133, s. 4; 2013-183, s. 5.6; 2013-360, s. 34.30.

Cross References.

As to annual report on the number of one-time toll facility users charged more than fifty dollars ($50.00) in processing fees imposed under

G.S. 136-89.215

and civil penalties assessed under

G.S. 136-89.216

, see

G.S. 136-89.193(b)

.

§ 136-89.216.
Civil penalty for failure to pay open road toll.

Penalty. — A person who receives two or more bills for unpaid open road tolls and who has not paid the amount due on those bills within 30 days is subject to a civil penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Only one penalty may be assessed in a six-month period.

Payment. — The Authority must send a notice by first-class mail to a person who is assessed a civil penalty under this section. A person who is assessed a civil penalty must pay the unpaid toll for which the civil penalty was imposed, the amount of any processing fee due, and the civil penalty within 30 days of the date of the notice.

Penalty Proceeds. — A civil penalty imposed under this section is payable to the Authority. The clear proceeds of a civil penalty imposed under this section must be credited to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund established in

G.S. 115C-457.1

. The guidelines used by the Office of State Budget and Management to determine an agency’s actual costs of collecting a civil penalty and the clear proceeds of the civil penalty apply to the determination of the clear proceeds of a civil penalty imposed under this section.

History.

2008-225, s. 2; 2010-133, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to annual report on the number of one-time toll facility users charged more than fifty dollars ($50.00) in processing fees imposed under

G.S. 136-89.215

and civil penalties assessed under

G.S. 136-89.216

, see

G.S. 136-89.193(b)

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-133, s. 5, effective December 1, 2010, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “two or more bills” for “one or more bills,” and deleted “during the first or second six-month period in a year” following “open road tolls” and “after the end of the six-month period” following “30 days,” deleted the second sentence, which read: “The period from January 1 through June 30 of a year is the first six-month period in a year, and the period from July 1 through December 31 is the second six-month period in a year,” and in the last sentence, substituted “in a six-month period” for “for a six-month period”; in subsection (b), substituted “within 30 days of the date of the notice” for “within 30 days after receiving the notice”; and in the first sentence in subsection (c), deleted “or, if collected when a vehicle registration is renewed, to the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation” from the end.

§ 136-89.217.
Vehicle registration renewal blocked for unpaid open road toll.

Registration Block. — Failure of a person to pay an open road toll billed to the person under

G.S. 136-89.214

, any processing fee added under

G.S. 136-89.215

, and any civil penalty imposed under

G.S. 136-89.216

, as well as any toll, processing fee, or civil penalty owed to another tolling jurisdiction with which the Authority has a valid reciprocal toll enforcement agreement under

G.S. 136-89.220

, is grounds under

G.S. 20-54

to withhold the registration renewal of a motor vehicle registered in that person’s name. The Authority must notify the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles of a person who owes a toll, a processing fee, or a civil penalty. When notified, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles must withhold the registration renewal of any motor vehicle registered in that person’s name.

Repealed by S.L. 2010-133, s. 6, effective December 1, 2010.

History.

2008-225, s. 2; 2010-133, s. 6; 2012-85, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-133, s. 6, effective December 1, 2010, deleted subsection (b), which pertained to the collection of unpaid tolls, processing fees, and civil penalties by the Division of Motor Vehicles.

Session Laws 2012-85, s. 10, effective June 26, 2012, substituted “G.S. 136-89.216, as well as any toll, processing fee, or civil penalty owed to another tolling jurisdiction with which the Authority has a valid reciprocal toll enforcement agreement under

G.S. 136-89.220

” for “G.S. 136-89.216” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

§ 136-89.218.
Procedures for contesting liability for unpaid open road toll.

Informal Review. — A person who receives a bill for an unpaid open road toll and who disputes liability for the toll may contest the toll by sending to the Authority a request for review of the toll. The person may include a sworn affidavit described in

G.S. 136-89.212

that establishes that someone else had the care, custody, and control of the motor vehicle subject to the toll when the toll was incurred. The person must send the request for review to the Authority within 30 days of the date of the bill sent by the Authority. A person who does not send a request for review to the Authority within this time limit waives the right to a review. If a person sends a timely request for review to the Authority, the Authority may not collect the disputed toll and any processing fee added to the bill for the toll until the conclusion of the review process in this section.

Administrative Hearing. — If the Authority conducts an informal review under subsection (a) of this section and determines that the person who requested the review is liable for the toll, the Authority must send the person a notice informing the person of the Authority’s determination. The person may contest this determination by filing a petition for a contested case hearing at the Office of Administrative Hearings in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Judicial Review. — Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes governs judicial review of a final decision made in a contested case authorized under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

2008-225, s. 2; 2010-133, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-133, s. 7, effective December 1, 2010, substituted “within 30 days of the date of the bill sent by the Authority” for “within 30 days after receiving the bill for the toll” in the third sentence of subsection (a).

§ 136-89.219.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 136-89.220.
Reciprocal toll enforcement agreements.

The Authority may enter into reciprocal agreement with other tolling jurisdictions to enforce toll violations. Such an agreement shall provide that, when another toll agency certifies that the registered owner of a vehicle registered in this State has failed to pay a toll, processing fee, or civil penalty due to that toll agency, the unpaid toll, processing fee, or civil penalty may be enforced by the Authority placing a renewal block as if it were an unpaid toll, processing fee, or civil penalty owed to this State under

G.S. 136-89.217

. Such agreement shall only be enforceable, however, if all of the following are true:

The other toll agency has its own effective reciprocal procedure for toll violation enforcement and does, in fact, reciprocate in enforcing toll violations within this State by withholding the registration renewal of registered owners of motor vehicles from the state of the other toll agency.

The other toll agency provides due process and appeal protections to avoid the likelihood that a false, mistaken, or unjustified claim will be pursued against the owner of a vehicle registered in this State.

The owner of a vehicle registered in this State may present evidence to the other toll agency by mail or other means to invoke rights of due process without having to appear personally in the jurisdiction where the violation allegedly occurred.

The reciprocal violation enforcement arrangement between the Authority and the other toll agency provides that each party shall charge the other for costs associated with registration holds in their respective jurisdictions.

History.

2012-85, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-85, s. 13, made this section effective June 26, 2012.